Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB687.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "design/build contract" in section 103 of Title 62 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 103. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this part which are applicable to specific provisions of this part, the following words and phrases when used in this part shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *123456789101112131415161718192021 ["Design/build contract." A construction contract in which the contractor is responsible for both the design and construction of any public structure or building or other public improvements of any kind to any public real property.]* * *"Project delivery method." As defined in section 3201 (relating to definitions).* * *Section 2. Sections 322(2) and (6) and 905(a) of Title 62 are amended to read:§ 322. Specific construction powers, duties and procedures.The following procedure shall apply to construction to be completed by the department which costs more than the amount established by the department under section 514 (relating to small procurements) for construction procurement unless the work is to be done by Commonwealth agency employees or by inmates or patients of a Commonwealth agency institution:* * *(2) Promptly after the notice in such cases or promptly after any appropriation made to it becomes available, the department shall, if necessary, select an architect and/or an engineer in accordance with the selection procedures of section 905 (relating to procurement of design professional services) to design the work and prepare the specifications therefor. [The department may, as an alternative, enter into a design/build contract in accordance with section 511 (relating to methods of source selection). Such design/build contracts shall be subject to the requirements of this act and the provisions of the act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act. 20250SB0687PN0666 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Design/build contracts shall also be subject to the act of May 1, 1913 (P.L.155, No.104), entitled "An act regulating the letting of certain contracts for the erection, construction, and alteration of public buildings," to the extent provided in paragraph (6).] The department may, as an alternative, enter into a project delivery method in accordance with section 511 (relating to methods of source selection). The project delivery method shall be subject to all of the following:(i) The requirements of this part.(ii) Chapter 32 (relating to project delivery methods) to the extent provided in paragraph (6).(iii) The act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act.* * *(6) For construction contracts where the total construction costs are less than $25,000, the department shall not be required to comply with [the act of May 1, 1913 (P.L.155, No.104), entitled "An act regulating the letting of certain contracts for the erection, construction, and alteration of public buildings,"] Chapter 32 and the department may award such contracts in accordance with section 511. All projects equal to or exceeding $25,000 shall be subject to [the act of May 1, 1913 (P.L.155, No.104), entitled "An act regulating the letting of certain contracts for the erection, construction, and alteration of public buildings."] Chapter 32. Whenever the department enters into a single contract for a project, in the absence of good and sufficient reasons the contractor shall pay each subcontractor, within 15 days of receipt of payment from the 20250SB0687PN0666 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department, an amount equal to the percentage of completion allowed to the contractor on the account of the subcontractor's work. The contractor shall also require the subcontractor to make similar payments to his subcontractors.* * *§ 905. Procurement of design professional services.(a) Applicability.--Design professional services shall be procured as provided in this section except as authorized by sections 514 (relating to small procurements), 515 (relating to sole source procurement) and 516 (relating to emergency procurement) and Chapter 32 (relating to project delivery methods).* * *Section 3. Title 62 is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 32PROJECT DELIVERY METHODSSec.3201. Definitions.3202. Utilization.§ 3201. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Construction management at-risk." A project delivery method by which a person provides construction management services throughout the preconstruction and construction phases and which guarantees the cost of the project."Design-bid-build with multiple prime contractors." A project delivery method by which a government agency or a State-related institution contracts for architectural and engineering 20250SB0687PN0666 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 design professional services and construction services under separate agreements."Design-bid-build with single prime contractor." A project delivery method by which a government agency or a State-related institution contracts for architectural and engineering design professional services and construction services under separate agreements, including preparation of a single agreement and specifications for construction services."Design-build." A project delivery method in which the contractor is responsible for both the design and construction of any public structure or building or other public improvements of any kind to any public real property."Project delivery method." Any of the following:(1) Construction management at-risk.(2) Design-bid-build with multiple prime contractors.(3) Design-bid-build with single prime contractor.(4) Design-build.§ 3202. Utilization.(a) Requirement.--A government agency or a State-related institution shall utilize a project delivery method for the procurement of construction services for the design, erection, construction and alteration of a public building in this Commonwealth if the total cost of the work exceeds $4,000.(b) Steel Products Procurement Act.--A contract awarded under this section shall comply with the act of March 3, 1978 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Steel Products Procurement Act.Section 4. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate the amendment or addition of 62 Pa.C.S. §§ 322(2) and (6) and 3202.20250SB0687PN0666 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The act of May 1, 1913 (P.L.155, No.104), referred to as the Separations Act, is repealed.Section 5. The addition of 62 Pa.C.S. § 3202 is a continuation of the act of May 1, 1913 (P.L.155, No.104), referred to as the Separations Act. Except as otherwise provided in 62 Pa.C.S. § 3202, all activities initiated under the Separations Act shall continue and remain in full force and effect and may be completed under 62 Pa.C.S. § 3202. Orders, regulations, rules and decisions which were made under the Separations Act and which are in effect on the effective date of section 4(2) of this act shall remain in full force and effect until revoked, vacated or modified under 62 Pa.C.S. § 3202. Contracts, obligations and collective bargaining agreements entered into under the Separations Act are not affected nor impaired by the repeal of the Separations Act.Section 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0687PN0666 - 6 - 12345678910111213141516